Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.520

Right to rescind transaction.

The borrower in a proprietary reverse mortgage transaction has the same right to rescind the transaction as provided in the truth in lending act, Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Part 1026.

[ 2015 c 229 s 36; 2009 c 149 s 4.]